Utah statutes.
53-1-106.   Department duties -- Powers.

(1)  In addition to the responsibilities contained in this title, the department shall:

(a)  make rules and perform the functions specified in Title 41, Chapter 6a, Traffic Code, including:

(i)  setting performance standards for towing companies to be used by the department, as required by Section 41-6a-1406; and

(ii)  advising the Department of Transportation regarding the safe design and operation of school buses, as required by Section 41-6a-1304;

(b)  make rules to establish and clarify standards pertaining to the curriculum and teaching methods of a motor vehicle accident prevention course under Section 31A-19a-211;

(c)  aid in enforcement efforts to combat drug trafficking;

(d)  meet with the Department of Technology Services to formulate contracts, establish priorities, and develop funding mechanisms for dispatch and telecommunications operations;

(e)  provide assistance to the Crime Victim Reparations Board and the Utah Office for Victims of Crime in conducting research or monitoring victims' programs, as required by Section 63M-7-505;

(f)  develop sexual assault exam protocol standards in conjunction with the Utah Hospital Association;

(g)  engage in emergency planning activities, including preparation of policy and procedure and rulemaking necessary for implementation of the federal Emergency Planning and Community Right to Know Act of 1986, as required by Section 63K-3-301; and

(h)  implement the provisions of Section 53-2-202, the Emergency Management Assistance Compact.

(2) (a)  The department may establish a schedule of fees as required or allowed in this title for services provided by the department.

(b)  The fees shall be established in accordance with Section 63J-1-504.

(3)  The department may establish or contract for the establishment of an Organ Procurement Donor Registry in accordance with Section 26-28-120.

